Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-2004
Customer-generator; inspection required; notice to local distribution utility; ownership of credits.

(1) A customer-generator shall request an inspection from the State Electrical Division pursuant to subsection (1) of section 81-2124 or subsection (1) of section 81-2125 and shall provide documentation of the completed inspection to the local distribution utility prior to interconnection with the local distribution system.

(2) A customer-generator is responsible for notifying the local distribution utility of its intent to install a qualified facility at least sixty days prior to its installation and is responsible for all costs associated with the qualified facility.

(3) A local distribution utility shall not be required to interconnect with a qualified facility that fails to meet or maintain the local distribution utility's requirements for safety, reliability, and interconnection.

(4) A customer-generator owns the renewable energy credits of the electricity its qualified facility generates.

Laws 2009, LB436, § 4.